Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1604.01
Certain blind persons; eligibility.

Any person who is blind as defined in section 71-8603 and who provides services under contract to the State of Nebraska to a disabled person as defined in section 68-1503 shall be afforded the opportunity to enroll in the state employees group health insurance program until age sixty-five. Eligible persons electing this option shall be responsible for the entire premium cost and an administrative fee consistent with that allowed by federal guidelines for continuation of health insurance.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 169;

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 18.